Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1145.
do enact as follows:SB1145,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1145,26Section 2. 20.255 (2) (dx) of the statutes is created to read:SB1145,2,8720.255 (2) (dx) Grants for safe transportation for school-sponsored events. The 8amounts in the schedule for grants to school districts under s. 115.369. SB1145,39Section 3. 115.369 of the statutes is created to read:SB1145,2,1310115.369 Grants for safe transportation for school-sponsored events. 11(1) Grants. The department shall award grants to school districts to provide a 12safe method of transportation for pupils in the high school grades attending a 13school-sponsored event.SB1145,2,1514(2) Sunset. The department may not award a grant under sub. (1) after June 1530, 2027.SB1145,416Section 4. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Acts 42 17and 79, is amended to read:SB1145,3,718119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1966.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 20115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.369, 115.38 (2), 21115.415, 115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06 to 118.076, 118.10, 118.12, 22118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 118.163, 23118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), 24(6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 118.293, 118.2935, 1118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 118.56, 118.58, 2120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) (b) to (g), (3), 3(14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 120.20, 4120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and board but 5not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a contract, to the 6commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools and 7partnership program.SB1145,3,88